Arkansas, session 2025, HB2003.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. The purpose of this act is to amend the Revenue
Stabilization Law.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code 19-5-401 is amended to read as follows:
19-5-401. Allocations for fiscal year 2025-2026 and thereafter.
Commencing with the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and each fiscal year
thereafter, the Treasurer of State shall transfer all remaining general
revenues available for distribution on the last day of business in July 2025,
and on the last day of business in each calendar month thereafter during the
fiscal year to the various funds and fund accounts participating in general
revenues in the proportions of the maximum allocation as the individual
allocation to the fund or fund account bears to the total of the maximum
allocation as provided in § 19-5-402 (a).

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code 19-5-402 is amended to read as follows:
19-5-402. Maximum allocations of revenues for fiscal year 2025-2026 and
thereafter.
(a) ALLOCATION A. The Treasurer of State shall first make monthly allocations
*HAR063*
04/09/2025 3:50:57 PM HAR063

HB2003
in the proportions set out in this subsection to the funds and fund accounts
listed below until there has been transferred a total of six billion four
hundred ninety three million nine hundred ninety eight thousand nine hundred
eighty-one dollars ($6,493,998,981) or so much thereof as may become
available; provided, that the Treasurer of State shall make such monthly
allocations in accordance with each fund or fund account's proportionate part
of the total of all such allocations set forth in this subsection:
Name of Fund or Fund Account Maximum Allocation

PUBLIC SCHOOL FUND
(1) Division of Elementary and Secondary Education
Public School Fund Account $2,443,582,431
(2) State Library Public School Fund Account $ 5,641,919
(3) Division of Career and Technical Education Public
School Fund Account $ 26,883,872
(4) Division of Career and Technical Education Public
School Fund Account - Adult Education $ 8,489,176

GENERAL EDUCATION FUND
(1) Division of Elementary and Secondary Education
Fund Account $ 18,282,199
(2) Educational Facilities Partnership Fund Account $ -
(3) Division of Public School Academic Facilities
and Transportation Fund Account $ 3,052,280
(4) Educational Television Fund Account $ 5,986,636
(5) School for the Blind Fund Account $ 8,392,869
(6) School for the Deaf Fund Account $ 12,098,079
(7) State Library Fund Account $ 3,923,088
(8) Division of Career and Technical Education Fund
Account $ -
(9) Rehabilitation Services Fund Account $ 11,942,101
(10) Child Care Grant Fund Account $ 7,056,193
(11) Child Care and Early Childhood Education
Fund Account $ 2,589,553
Technical Institutes:
(12) Northwest Technical Institute Fund Account $ 3,388,836
04/09/2025 3:50:57 PM HAR063

HB2003

DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES FUND
(1) Department of Human Services Administration
Fund Account $ 25,037,046
(2) Children and Family Services Fund Account 139,733,393
(3) Youth Services Fund Account 53,431,260
(4) Developmental Disabilities Services Fund Account 65,603,057
(5) Medical Services Fund Account 2,564,587
(6) Department of Human Services Grants Fund Account 1,402,725,705
(7) Behavioral Health Services Fund Account 104,981,456
(8) Provider Services and Quality Assurance Fund
Account 5,998,017
(9) County Operations Fund Account 58,700,789

STATE GENERAL GOVERNMENT FUND
(1) Division of Arkansas Heritage Fund Account $ 7,755,838
(2) Department of Agriculture Fund Account 19,870,371
(3) Department of Labor and Licensing Fund Account 4,019,479
(4) Division of Higher Education Fund Account 12,066,588
(5) Higher Education Grants Fund Account 43,619,625
(6) Arkansas Economic Development Commission
Fund Account 20,660,189
(7) Division of Correction Inmate Care
and Custody Fund Account 343,674,492
(8) Division of Correction Inmate Care
and Custody Fund Account - Medical Contract 139,398,915
(9) Division of Community Correction Fund Account 107,773,354
(10) Department of the Military Fund Account 8,931,344
(11) Parks and Tourism Fund Account 22,082,257
(12) Division of Environmental Quality
Fund Account 4,297,361
(13) Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account 83,280,732

COUNTY AID FUND $ 21,428,616
COUNTY JAIL REIMBURSEMENT FUND $ 34,800,000
CRIME INFORMATION SYSTEM FUND $ 2,204,581
04/09/2025 3:50:57 PM HAR063

HB2003
CHILD SUPPORT ENFORCEMENT FUND $ 13,288,801
PUBLIC HEALTH FUND $ 82,752,300
PERFORMANCE FUND $ 3,150,000
MOTOR VEHICLE ACQUISITION REVOLVING FUND $ -
MUNICIPAL AID FUND $ 29,372,099
DIVISION OF ARKANSAS STATE POLICE FUND $ 94,140,872
DIVISION OF WORKFORCE SERVICES FUND-NEW HIRE REGISTRY $ 150,000
DIVISION OF WORKFORCE SERVICES FUND-ADULT EDUCATION $ 1,057,391
DIVISION OF WORKFORCE SERVICES FUND-MANUFACTURING
EXTENSION NETWORK $ 679,545
STATE SERVICES FOR THE BLIND FUND $ 1,972,456
SKILLS DEVELOPMENT FUND $ 3,608,348
ARKANSAS CHILDREN'S EDUCATIONAL FREEDOM ACCOUNT FUND $ 187,487,318
SUSTAINABLE BUILDING MAINTENANCE PROGRAM FOR STATE-
SUPPORTED INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION REVOLVING LOAN
FUND $ 2,881,420

INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION
(1) ARKANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY FUND $ 62,862,957
(2) ARKANSAS TECH UNIVERSITY FUND $ 35,628,929
(3) HENDERSON STATE UNIVERSITY FUND $ 18,457,299
(4) SOUTHERN ARKANSAS UNIVERSITY FUND $ 17,733,361
(5) UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS FUND $ 136,032,727
(6) UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS FUND-UA SYSTEM $ 3,479,474
(7) UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS FUND-ARCHEOLOGICAL SURVEY $ 2,369,274
(8) UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS FUND-DIVISION OF
AGRICULTURE $ 65,800,138
(9) UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS FUND-CLINTON SCHOOL $ 2,336,896
(10) UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS FUND-CRIMINAL JUSTICE
INSTITUTE $ 2,458,634
(11) SCHOOL FOR MATH, SCIENCES, AND ARTS FUND $ 1,133,048
(12) UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS AT FORT SMITH FUND $ 20,886,786
(13) UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS AT LITTLE ROCK FUND $ 58,929,169
(14) UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS MEDICAL CENTER FUND $ 93,012,881
(15) UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS MEDICAL CENTER FUND -
CHILD ABUSE/RAPE/DOMESTIC VIOLENCE $ 350,000
04/09/2025 3:50:57 PM HAR063

HB2003
(16) UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS MEDICAL CENTER FUND -
PEDIATRICS/PSYCHIATRIC RESEARCH $ 1,985,100
(17) UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS MEDICAL CENTER FUND -
INDIGENT CARE $ 5,438,340
(18) UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS AT MONTICELLO FUND $ 16,362,815
(19) UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS AT PINE BLUFF FUND $ 21,464,639
(20) UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS AT PINE BLUFF FUND - 1890
LAND GRANT STATE MATCH $ 5,800,000
(21) UNIVERSITY OF CENTRAL ARKANSAS FUND $ 55,018,565
(22) ARKANSAS NORTHEASTERN COLLEGE FUND $ 8,845,933
(23) ARKANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY - BEEBE FUND $ 11,333,296
(24) ARKANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY - MOUNTAIN HOME FUND $ 3,571,700
(25) ARKANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY - NEWPORT FUND $ 6,451,670
(26) COSSATOT COMMUNITY COLLEGE OF THE UNIVERSITY
OF ARKANSAS FUND $ 3,750,333
(27) UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS EAST ARKANSAS COMMUNITY
COLLEGE FUND $ 8,708,498
(28) ARKANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY MID-SOUTH FUND $ 4,058,019
(29) ARKANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY MID-SOUTH FUND - ADTEC $ 1,527,000
(30) NATIONAL PARK COLLEGE FUND $ 8,995,082
(31) NORTH ARKANSAS COLLEGE FUND $ 7,529,669
(32) NORTHWEST ARKANSAS COMMUNITY COLLEGE FUND $ 11,479,213
(33) PHILLIPS COMMUNITY COLLEGE OF THE UNIVERSITY
OF ARKANSAS FUND $ 8,756,310
(34) UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS COMMUNITY COLLEGE AT RICH
MOUNTAIN FUND $ 3,656,930
(35) SAU-TECH FUND $ 5,525,530
(36) SAU-TECH FUND-ENVIRONMENTAL TRAINING ACADEMY $ 375,036
(37) SAU-TECH FUND-FIRE TRAINING ACADEMY $ 1,780,943
(38) SOUTH ARKANSAS COLLEGE FUND $ 5,962,675
(39) UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS COMMUNITY COLLEGE AT
BATESVILLE FUND $ 4,318,464
(40) UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS COMMUNITY COLLEGE AT
HOPE-TEXARKANA FUND $ 4,554,683
(41) UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS COMMUNITY COLLEGE AT
MORRILTON FUND $ 5,073,879
04/09/2025 3:50:57 PM HAR063

HB2003
(42) BLACK RIVER TECHNICAL COLLEGE FUND $ 7,187,648
(43) ARKANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY THREE RIVERS FUND $ 3,347,546
(44) OZARKA COLLEGE FUND $ 3,183,318
(45) UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS - PULASKI TECHNICAL COLLEGE
FUND $ 14,694,332
(46) SOUTHEAST ARKANSAS COLLEGE FUND $ 5,301,408

SECTION 4. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS CODE NOR PUBLISHED
SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. DUPLICATE ACTS. If the
House bill to amend the Revenue Stabilization Law and the Senate bill to
amend the Revenue Stabilization Law of the 2025 Regular Session of the 95th
General Assembly are both enacted and adopted by the 95th General Assembly in
identical form, then the last Act passed or latest expression shall supersede
the other.

SECTION 5. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that changes in the state's fiscal
laws must take effect at the beginning of the fiscal year; and that it is
necessary for this act to become effective on July 1, 2025, to avoid a lapse
in critical and essential services that the state government provides to the
citizens of this state at the beginning of the next fiscal year. Therefore,
an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the
preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective
on July 1, 2025.












04/09/2025 3:50:57 PM HAR063